Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Chapter 11 Interstate Streams Commission

Cross references. —

As to cooperation and agreements between Utah and Montana with reference to water and water rights, see §

41-4-103

.

As to diversion or storage of water for use in adjoining state, see §§

41-4-104

,

41-4-105

.

As to interstate compact relative to water generally, see §§

41-12-101

through

41-12-801

.

For constitutional provisions relative to irrigation and water rights generally, see Wyo. Const., art. 8, §§ 1 through 5.

As to construction and improvement of works for conservation and utilization of water, see Wyo. Const., art. 16, § 10.

For duties of attorney general as to interstate streams, see §

9-1-605

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

78 Am. Jur. 2d Waters §§ 133 to 136, 138.